Oklahoma, session 2025, SB780.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 376 of Title 21, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, the terms “flag”, “standard”,


“colors”, or “ensign” of the United States shall have the same


meaning as used in subsection C of Section 372 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person who takes down or removes the flag, standard,


colors, or ensign of the United States of America on public property


or private property owned by another person or entity without


permission and puts up the flag, standard, colors, or ensign of any


other entity shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony


punishable by a fine not to exceed Three Thousand Dollars

Req. No. 36 Page 1


($3,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for not more than three (3) years, or by both such fine


and imprisonment.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-36 CN 1/19/2025 5:43:11 AM





































Req. No. 36 Page 2